Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 17

County-wide Fire Departments

5-17-101. Formation.

The county legislative body or other governing body of any county is authorized to form a new agency to be known as the county-wide fire department for the purpose of providing fire protection services to all of the county.

The powers and duties of the county-wide fire department may be delegated by the county legislative body or other governing body to an existing agency.

The governing body of any county that now has or may hereafter have a metropolitan form of government as defined by § 7-1-101, is authorized to form a new agency to be known as the county-wide fire department, or to extend fire protection services of an existing agency or department to all or any part thereof of the general services district outside the urban services district in the manner and to the extent prescribed in this section.

In counties governed by metropolitan government, the powers and duties of the agency or department affording fire protection outside the urban services district shall be vested in that agency in which the charter of the metropolitan government vests the responsibility for protection against fire of life and property within the urban services district.

A fire department established pursuant to this chapter may be funded through one (1) of the following methods:

As authorized by §§ 5-17-105 — 5-17-107, the county legislative body may establish one (1) or more fire and emergency services tax districts and levy an annual fire and emergency services tax upon the property in each district for the purpose of funding the activities of the fire department within that district;

As an alternative to fire and emergency services tax districts, the county legislative body is hereby authorized to allocate revenue from the general fund of the county to fund fire protection services to be provided to the unincorporated portions of the county. Any such revenues allocated for fire protection services shall be generated by situs-based taxes collected in unincorporated areas of the county or shall originate from other revenue sources that have already been shared with municipalities;

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the ability of local governments to provide for fire protection services through an interlocal agreement as authorized by title 12, chapter 9, or any other provision of the Tennessee Code;

Nothing in this subsection (d) shall prohibit nor be construed to prohibit a local government from accepting donations or charitable contributions to fund the activities of the fire department, regardless of the method of funding selected by a local government under this section.

Any county choosing to create a county-wide fire district as authorized by this section, may, with the approval of the local legislative body, mandate that all interlocal agreements and contracts with providers for services permitted under this section contain performance-based criteria designed to ensure timely response and effective services, the exact methodology of which is to be determined by local ordinance.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 1; 1968, ch. 611, § 1; 1973, ch. 211, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1701; Acts 1999, ch. 125, § 1; 2007, ch. 145, § 1; 2012, ch. 771, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 771, § 2 provided that any county which, prior to April 19, 2012, has created a fire tax district or imposed a fire tax pursuant to this part is not required, but is authorized, to adopt a resolution to rename the district or the tax to be designated as the fire and emergency services tax district or the fire and emergency services tax; provided, that such district shall hereafter be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax district and the tax shall be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax.

Cross-References. Cities, counties and towns, mutual assistance in fire fighting, title 6, ch. 54, part 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Provisions not applicable to county funding volunteer fire departments, OAG 97-141, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (10/14/97).

Funding volunteer fire service, OAG 07-087, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 87 (6/5/07).

5-17-102. Powers and duties.

With the specific exceptions relating to metropolitan governments provided for in this section, the county-wide fire department is empowered to do all things necessary to provide coordinated fire protection to all areas of the county, including, but not limited to:

Sue and be sued;

Take or acquire real or personal property of every kind, or any interest therein, within the county, by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease, and hold, manage, occupy, dispose of, convey and encumber the same and create a leasehold interest in the same for the benefit of the county;

Exercise the right of eminent domain, but only with the consent of the county legislative body or other governing body;

Establish, equip, operate and maintain a county-wide fire department and establish and enforce regulations including, but not limited to, those for the administration, operation and maintenance thereof;

Appoint and employ necessary employees and define their qualifications, duties and responsibilities, and provide for payment in reasonable sums for such duties;

Employ counsel;

Enter into and perform all necessary contracts, including, but not limited to:

Contracts for the supply of water where necessary for fire protection;

Contract to have existing fire departments and others provide fire protection services in any area of the county, including, but not limited to:

Contracts with incorporated towns and utility districts to provide such service within or without their corporate limits;

Contracts to provide fire protection services for any city, town, district, or any part thereof within the county;

Contracts to provide and be provided training and maintenance;

Contracts to provide and be provided all special service functions, such as arson investigation, inspection, and emergency ambulance and rescue services;

Provide and maintain all special service functions necessary for the prevention of fires, including the investigation of the cause of fires and the enforcement of regulations to prevent harmful fires and smoke;

Provide and maintain an emergency ambulance, first aid and rescue service;

Make regulations, in order to prevent harmful fires and smoke, that shall have the force of law when approved by the county legislative body or other governing body;

Give aid anywhere in the county in the event of fire, flood or other disaster;

Assist local and volunteer fire departments whenever necessary. Such assistance includes, but is not limited to, financial aid and shall be upon such terms as agreed to by both parties;

Provide training and maintenance services for the benefit of any fire department;

Set up a central communications network connecting all fire and emergency units in the county;

Train, equip, maintain, and provide for the payment of volunteers at the discretion of the county-wide fire department;

Recommend the boundaries of fire and emergency services tax district or districts to the county legislative body or other governing body, in those counties that have chosen to fund fire departments through fire and emergency services tax districts, in order to have the fire and emergency services taxes more nearly reflect the cost of services to be rendered in each area of the county, and recommend the amount to be spent in each such district;

Make reasonable charges for any services rendered that are not included in the fire and emergency services tax of the district; and

With the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body, make written agreements for allocation and conveyance of any or all public functions, rights, duties, property, assets and liabilities of the county-wide fire department to any annexing municipality that justice or reason may require in the circumstances.

In those counties that now have or may hereafter have a metropolitan form of government, the powers described in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3), (5), (6) and (9) shall not be vested in the county-wide fire department, but shall be vested in the metropolitan government, to be exercised in the manner provided by its charter.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 2; 1968, ch. 611, §§ 2, 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1702; Acts 1999, ch. 125, § 2; 2012, ch. 771, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 771, § 2 provided that any county which, prior to April 19, 2012, has created a fire tax district or imposed a fire tax pursuant to this part is not required, but is authorized, to adopt a resolution to rename the district or the tax to be designated as the fire and emergency services tax district or the fire and emergency services tax; provided, that such district shall hereafter be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax district and the tax shall be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax.

Attorney General Opinions. Contract between county-wide fire department and nonprofit fire service. OAG 10-119, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 125 (12/28/10).

5-17-103. County fire chief.

The county-wide fire department shall be headed by an official to be known as the county fire chief, in whom shall be vested all the powers of the agency and the right to delegate those powers to such persons as the fire chief may see fit.

While responding to, operating at, or returning from an emergency site, the fire chief, or any member serving in the capacity of fire officer in charge, shall have all authority granted to municipal fire departments by § 6-21-703.

The county fire chief shall be appointed by the county mayor, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body or other governing body.

In counties governed by a metropolitan government as defined by § 7-1-101, this section shall not be effective, and the management and control of the agency or department shall be vested in the person in whom the charter of the metropolitan government vests the management and control of the agency that has the responsibility for the protection against fire of life and property within the urban services district.

In any county having a population of not less than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county fire chief shall be appointed by the county mayor, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body. The county mayor and legislative body shall ensure that the views and opinions of all participating governmental entities are given full consideration in the selection of the fire chief, with the exact methodology to be determined by local ordinance.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 3; 1968, ch. 611, § 4; 1978, ch. 674, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1703; Acts 1999, ch. 125, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2007, ch. 39, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-17-104. Budget.

The county-wide fire department shall prepare an annual budget of anticipated receipts and expenditures, and it shall be submitted to the county legislative body or other governing body of the county.

In those counties that have established fire and emergency services tax districts, the county-wide fire department shall determine what share of the total annual expense of the county-wide fire department must be allocated to each fire and emergency services tax district.

In those counties having a metropolitan government, the budget for the county-wide fire department shall be prepared, submitted and adopted in the manner provided therefor in the charter of the metropolitan government.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 4; 1968, ch. 611, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1704; Acts 1999, ch. 125, § 3; 2012, ch. 771, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 771, § 2 provided that any county which, prior to April 19, 2012, has created a fire tax district or imposed a fire tax pursuant to this part is not required, but is authorized, to adopt a resolution to rename the district or the tax to be designated as the fire and emergency services tax district or the fire and emergency services tax; provided, that such district shall hereafter be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax district and the tax shall be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax.

5-17-105. Fire and emergency services tax districts.

The boundaries of fire and emergency services tax districts shall be determined by the county legislative body or other governing body, and shall become fixed by resolution of the county legislative body or other governing body thirty (30) days or more after notice of the determination of the boundaries of a district has been given to the property owners of the district.

Such notice shall be given by mailing a description of the boundaries of the district to all of the property owners of record within the district, at their last known address.

The boundaries of any district may be altered at any time by means of the same procedure by which the district was created.

In the case of county-wide fire districts as authorized by § 5-17-101, the fire and emergency services tax district shall comprise the entire county outside of any and all incorporated municipalities within the county, but each and every such incorporated municipality within the county may elect to contract with the county for inclusion in such fire and emergency services tax district as authorized by § 5-17-108.

In those counties having eight (8) or more incorporated municipalities that levy a property tax and four (4) or more special school districts, the fire and emergency services tax district shall comprise the entire county, including each and every incorporated municipality.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 5; 1978, ch. 674, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1705; Acts 1996, ch. 836, § 1; 2012, ch. 771, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 771, § 2 provided that any county which, prior to April 19, 2012, has created a fire tax district or imposed a fire tax pursuant to this part is not required, but is authorized, to adopt a resolution to rename the district or the tax to be designated as the fire and emergency services tax district or the fire and emergency services tax; provided, that such district shall hereafter be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax district and the tax shall be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax.

5-17-106. Fire and emergency services tax — Levy.

The county legislative body or other governing body shall levy an annual fire and emergency services tax upon the property owners of each district. The county legislative body of any county having a population of not less than eighty thousand (80,000) nor more than eighty-three thousand (83,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that after April 8, 1992, establishes a fire and emergency services tax district, may levy an annual fire and emergency services tax upon the property owners of each district. If a tax is levied, subsection (b) shall apply to such fire and emergency services tax.

The fire and emergency services tax of each fire and emergency services tax district shall be set at a rate sufficient to pay that district's share of the total budget of the county-wide fire department.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1706; Acts 1992, ch. 649, § 1; 2012, ch. 771, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2012, ch. 771, § 2 provided that any county which, prior to April 19, 2012, has created a fire tax district or imposed a fire tax pursuant to this part is not required, but is authorized, to adopt a resolution to rename the district or the tax to be designated as the fire and emergency services tax district or the fire and emergency services tax; provided, that such district shall hereafter be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax district and the tax shall be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax.

5-17-107. Fire and emergency services tax — Inclusion in property tax.

The fire and emergency services tax shall be assessed in the same manner as the county property tax and collected as an addition thereto.

The fire and emergency services tax shall in all ways be treated as a part of the county property tax.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 7; T.C.A., § 5-1707; Acts 2012, ch. 771, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 771, § 2 provided that any county which, prior to April 19, 2012, has created a fire tax district or imposed a fire tax pursuant to this part is not required, but is authorized, to adopt a resolution to rename the district or the tax to be designated as the fire and emergency services tax district or the fire and emergency services tax; provided, that such district shall hereafter be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax district and the tax shall be known and cited as the fire and emergency services tax.

5-17-108. Service supplementary.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit in any way the fire departments of any municipality or utility district providing fire service, but merely authorizes such county fire protection service to contract with municipalities or utility districts in order to coordinate fire service county-wide.

Acts 1965, ch. 138, § 8; T.C.A., § 5-1708.